Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1244
Fireworks; unlawful
acts.

Except as provided in section 28-1245, it
shall be unlawful for any person to possess, sell, offer for sale, bring into
this state, or discharge any fireworks other than consumer fireworks.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 276;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 5.